South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5573.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The Spartanburg Auditorium Memorial Commission shall not have the authority to approve of, without first seeking the approval from the Spartanburg County Legislative Delegation, any art exhibit, production, show, or other form of entertainment that is found to contain scenes the average person, applying contemporary state community standards would find that the production, taken as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest, whether the production depicts or describes, in a patently offensive way, sexual conduct, and whether the production, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value. SECTION 2.  SECTION 2(A) and (B) of Act 813 of 1946, as last amended by Act 186 of 1995, is further amended to read: SECTION 2. (A) The Spartanburg Memorial Auditorium Commission is composed of thirteen fourteen members with two three of whom serving ex officio as provided in item (3). The commission must be appointed as follows: (1) Five must be appointed by a special joint committee. The special joint committee shall consist of two members of the Spartanburg City Council, two members of the Spartanburg City Council, and two members of the Auditorium Commission as determined by the respective bodies. The special joint committee shall appoint representatives from the legal profession, the engineering/mechanical profession, the accounting/financial profession, the hospitality industry, and the communications/marketing community the Spartanburg County Legislative Delegation. Qualifications for the five commissioners appointed by the Spartanburg County Legislative Delegation may include experience in the legal, business, accounting and finance, or art, recreation, and tourism industries. The Spartanburg County Legislative Delegation shall make new appointments to the commission upon expiration of the terms of commissioners appointed by the special joint committee. (2) Two must be appointed by the Spartanburg City Council and four members to the appointed by the Spartanburg County Council. (3) The Mayor of the City of Spartanburg and the Chairman of the Spartanburg County Council or their designated member of their respective council and the Spartanburg County Legislative Delegation Chairman, or his designee, shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the Auditorium Commission with voting rights. (B) All terms of the appointed members are for four years except that initial appointments may be for less than four years in order to ensure a staggering and rotation of the terms of Auditorium Commission members. No commissioner may serve more than two consecutive full four-year terms. A commissioner is eligible for reappointment after having served two full four-year terms, but may not be reappointed for at least one year following the end of the second consecutive term. Current members of the Auditorium Commission must be appointed to an initial four-year term. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----